es: Escala de la figura de acción: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Otro
en: Action figure scale: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Other
nl: Schaal van actiefiguren: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Overig
tr: Aksiyon figürü ölçeği: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Diğer
it: Scala delle action figure: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Altro
fi: Toimintahahmon mittakaava: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Muu
el: Κλίμακα φιγούρας δράσης: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Άλλο
lt-LT: Veiksmo figūrėlės mastelis: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Kita
pt-BR: Escala do boneco de ação: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Outros
vi: Tỷ lệ mô hình hành động: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Khác
pl: Skala figurki kolekcjonerskiej: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Inne
nb: Actionfigur skala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Annet
th: สเกลของแอ็กชันฟิกเกอร์: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 動作玩偶比例: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 其他
sk-SK: Mierka akčnej figúrky: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Iné
fr: Échelle de la figurine articulée: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Autre
ru: Масштаб фигурки: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Другое
ko: 액션 피규어 스케일: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 기타
de: Maßstab der Actionfigur: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Andere
cs: Měřítko akčních figurek: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Ostatní
bg-BG: Мащаб на екшън фигурата: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Други
hr-HR: Skala akcijske figure: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Ostalo
ro-RO: Figurină de acțiune la scală: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Altele
zh-CN: 可动人偶比例: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 其他
pt-PT: Escala da figura de ação: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Outro
sv: Actionfigurens skala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Övrigt
da: Actionfigurstørrelse: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Andet
hu: Akciófigura mérete: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Egyéb
ja: アクションフィギュア拡大: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; その他
sl-SI: Merilo akcijske figurice: 1:10; 1:12; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; Drugo